Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
CHAPTER 6A Organizational Sessions of the General Assembly

6A.010.
Employees. [Repealed.]

6A.020.
Compensation. [Repealed.]

6A.030.
Expense allowance. [Repealed.]

6A.040.
Prorating of allowance authorized by KRS 6.213. [Repealed.]

6A.050.
Allowance in lieu of stationery. [Repealed.]

6A.060.
Lobbyists. [Repealed.]

6A.070.
Daily index and digest. [Repealed.]

6A.080.
Orientation conference. [Repealed.]

6A.090.
Prefiling of bill or resolution. [Repealed.]

6A.100.
Application of KRS Chapter 6. [Repealed.]

6A.110.
Renumbered as KRS 6.247. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

6A.120.
Action of Program Review and Investigation Committee. [Repealed.]

6A.130.
Action of Administrative Regulation Committee. [Repealed.]

6A.140.
Assignment of bills to committees. [Repealed.]

6A.150.
Rulemaking powers. [Repealed.]